Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3722.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 4-112, as
amended by Section 18, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (26 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 4-112), is amended to read as follows:
Section 4-112. A. The Secretary of the State Election Board
shall devise and distribute a registration application form to be

HB3722 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

used for registering voters. Such registration application shall
contain the following information:
1. The applicant's full name and date of birth, county and
place of residence, and mailing address pursuant to the provisions
of subsection G of this section;
2. A space or section to designate a political party recognized
by the laws of the State of Oklahoma with which the applicant
chooses to be affiliated;
3. The Oklahoma driver license or identification card number if
the applicant has been issued a current and valid driver license or
identification card by Service Oklahoma, or if the applicant does
not have a valid Oklahoma driver license or identification card, the
last four digits of the voter's Social Security number;
4. An oath of the eligibility of the applicant to become a
registered voter; and
5. Such other information as may be deemed necessary by the
Secretary to identify such applicant and to ascertain his or her
eligibility.
B. A voter registration application shall be signed by the
applicant in writing. The applicant shall personally subscribe his
or her name to or make his or her mark on the application, and no
agent, representative or employee of the applicant may sign or mark
on the applicant's behalf. The signature or mark must be the
original, handwritten signature, autograph or mark of the applicant.
HB3722 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

No f acsimile, reproduction, typewritten or other substitute
signature, autograph or mark will be valid. Notwithstanding any law
to the contrary, the Secretary of the State Election Board shall
prescribe procedures to authorize any person incapable of personally
making a mark to complete a voter registration application with
assistance of an official of any voter registration agency or
licensed operator specified in Sections 4-109.2 and 4-109.3 of this
title. Provided, for applications submitted electronically, in lieu
of the signature requirements set forth in this subsection, the
applicant shall consent to the use of his or her driver license or
identification card signature as provided in Section 4-109.4 of this
title.
C. Persons who do not indicate a recognized political party or
political organization on their registration application, or select
an Independent designation, shall not be designated as Independents
deemed to have completed their registration. Such applicant shall
be notified in the manner prescribed by law to complete the
application by selecting a party affiliation or Independent status
before the application can be accepted.
D. Any person may apply in writing to the Secretary of the
State Election Board for permission to print, copy or otherwise
prepare and distribute the registration applications designed by the
Secretary of the State Election Board. The Secretary may revoke any
such permission at any time.
HB3722 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

E. All registration applications shall be distributed to the
public at no charge.
F. The Secretary also shall prescribe procedures to accept and
use the National Mail Voter Registration Form, or its successor, as
required by the National Voter Registration Act of 1993. Provided,
to be accepted as a valid voter registration application, the form
shall include the applicant's original, handwritten signature,
autograph or mark as described in subsection B of this section.
G. Applicants for voter registration or for change of voter
registration in any way shall provide a residence address and, if
different from the residence address, a mailing address. A
residence address shall include the street address of the residence,
including a full house number, street name or number, apartment or
suite number, if applicable, and zip code. If a street address is
not available for the residence, applicants shall provide such
information as the Secretary of the State Election Board deems
necessary for voter registration purposes. A post office box may
not be given as a residence address. A mailing address, which shall
include the city and zip ZIP code, may be the actual emergency
notification or 911 address on file in the local community, a rural
route and box number, a post office box number or a street address.
H. A full or partial Social Security number or driver license
number in a voter registration record or a voter registration
application shall not be considered a public record and shall be
HB3722 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

kept confidential by the State Election Board and each county
election board.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective January 1, 2027.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON GOVERNMENT OVERSIGHT, dated
02/25/2026 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.



















HB3722 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.